Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5107YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2050 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 279.65B Discipline of students who 1 interfere with an orderly education process. 2 1. The board of directors of each school district shall 3 adopt policies that describe how the school district and school 4 district employees may discipline a student who interferes with 5 or prevents the orderly education process, or who otherwise 6 violates the school districtâs student handbook. The policies 7 must do all of the following: 8 a. Authorize a teacher to take disciplinary action to 9 correct a studentâs behavior when the student interferes with 10 the orderly education process or otherwise violates the school 11 districtâs student handbook. 12 b. (1) Provide that when a studentâs behavior prevents 13 the orderly instruction of other students, poses an immediate 14 threat to the safety or physical well-being of any student 15 or teacher, or when a student otherwise violates the school 16 districtâs student handbook, the studentâs teacher may 17 immediately remove the student from the classroom and place the 18 student with the principal or the principalâs designee. 19 (2) (a) Provide that after a studentâs third removal from 20 the classroom pursuant to subparagraph (1), the studentâs 21 teacher and the principal shall discuss the studentâs 22 disruptive behavior patterns and potential disciplinary actions 23 the school district may take prior to the teacher or principal 24 implementing any new disciplinary action against the student. 25 (b) Provide that after a studentâs third removal from the 26 classroom, the student shall not be permitted to return to 27 the classroom until after the studentâs teacher, or another 28 school district employee designated by the principal, and 29 either the studentâs parent or guardian, if the student is not 30 an emancipated minor, or the student, if the student is an 31 emancipated minor, participate in a conference that is designed 32 to identify the reasons for the studentâs behavior and the 33 disciplinary actions the school district may take that are best 34 suited to improve the studentâs behavior. The participants 35 -1- LSB 5107YH (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2050 may participate in the conference in person or by electronic 1 means. The school district shall give written notice to the 2 studentâs parent or guardian or to the student, as applicable, 3 prior to such conference that includes information related to 4 the studentâs behavior. 5 2. A principal or administrator shall not do any of the 6 following: 7 a. Prohibit or discourage a teacher from taking disciplinary 8 action in accordance with the policies adopted pursuant to 9 subsection 1, recommending disciplinary action in accordance 10 with the policies adopted pursuant to subsection 1, or 11 completing a document to initiate disciplinary action in 12 accordance with the policies adopted pursuant to subsection 1 13 against a student who interferes with the orderly education 14 process or who otherwise violates the school districtâs student 15 handbook. 16 b. Retaliate or take any adverse employment action against 17 a teacher for taking disciplinary action in accordance with the 18 policies adopted pursuant to subsection 1 against a student who 19 interferes with the orderly education process or who otherwise 20 violates the school districtâs student handbook. 21 3. A school district shall not do any of the following: 22 a. Adopt policies that prohibit a teacher from exercising 23 the teacherâs rights established pursuant to subsection 1. 24 b. Retaliate or take any adverse employment action against 25 a teacher for exercising the teacherâs rights established 26 pursuant to subsection 1. 27 4. This section shall not be construed to authorize a 28 teacher to violate the provisions of any policy adopted by 29 the board of directors of the school district pursuant to 30 subsection 1. 31 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect December 31, 32 2026. 33